Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2104
State Electrical Board; powers enumerated.

The board shall have power to:

(1) Elect its own officers;

(2) Engage and fix the compensation of such officers, inspectors, and employees as may be required in the performance of its duties;

(3) Pay such other expenses as may be necessary in the performance of its duties;

(4) Provide upon request such additional voluntary inspections and reviews as it deems appropriate;

(5) Adopt, promulgate, and revise rules and regulations necessary to enable it to carry into effect the State Electrical Act. In adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations, the board shall be governed by the minimum standards set forth in the National Electrical Code issued and adopted by the National Fire Protection Association in 2017, Publication Number 70-2017, which code shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State and the board and shall be a public record. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing wiring standards that protect public safety and health and property and that apply to all electrical wiring which is installed subject to the State Electrical Act;

(6) Revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license or registration granted pursuant to the State Electrical Act when the licensee or registrant (a) violates any provision of the National Electrical Code as adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section, the act, or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, (b) fails or refuses to pay any examination, registration, or license renewal fee required by law, (c) is an electrical contractor or master electrician and fails or refuses to provide and keep in force a public liability insurance policy as required by the board, or (d) violates any political subdivision's approved inspection ordinances;

(7) Order disconnection of power to any electrical installation that is proximately dangerous to health and property;

(8) Order removal of electrical wiring and apparatus from premises when such wiring and apparatus is proximately dangerous to health and property;

(9) Investigate, for the purpose of identifying dangerous electrical wiring or violations of the National Electrical Code as adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section, any death by electrocution that occurs within the State of Nebraska;

(10) Refuse to renew any license granted pursuant to the act when the licensee fails to submit evidence of completing the continuing education requirements under section 81-2117.01;

(11) Provide for the amount and collection of fees for inspection and other services;

(12) Adopt a seal, and the executive secretary shall have the care and custody thereof; and

(13) Enforce the provisions of the National Electrical Code as adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 906, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 77, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1981, § 81-575;

Laws 1984, LB 946, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 69, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 863, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 215, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 192, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 933, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 91, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 873, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 201, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB411, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB56, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB455, § 1.